src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.dic
abstener/DX     
adherir/XD 
adormir/XP
adquirir/X D  I
advenir/PXD
advertir/XP     D   
afre ir/XD
antever/X
arg ir/XpD
arrepentir/X   DP  
astre ir/XD
caber/X      GD
capitidisminuir/XD
circuir/XD
circunferir/XD
colegir/pDX
comedir/hXPD
competir/XRD
componer/pXh 
compungir/XD
concluir/X DQ
conferir/X D  
constituir/XpD
constre ir/XD 
construir/pDX    
contrahacer/X
contraponer/XA 
contravenir/XD
controvertir/XD
convenir/hDXp
deferir/XD
derretir/XP  D
derruir/XD 
desabrir/PDX
desadvertir/X
desavenir/X
desce ir/X
desconsentir/X
desfacer/X
desle r/XR
desmedir/X
deso r/X
deste ir/X
destituir/X   D
destruir/X      D
diferir/X D
difluir/XD
digerir/X QD
diluir/XD    
disconvenir/XD
disentir/XPQD
disminuir/X  D  
disponer/kXnA 
distribuir/Xp D
dormir/X  D    
efluir/XD
elegir/XD   
emba r/XDR
embestir/XB   D 
engre r/X DR
entrever/X
equivaler/XD
erguir/X DP
esmuir/XD
estatuir/XD
estre ir/XPD
excluir/XD     Q
expedir/XAD 
exponer/X A    
extraer/X L   D  I
fluir/kXfaDp
fre r/XD  R   
fruir/XAD
garantir/XD
gemir/XD
gruir/XD
hacer/Xph 
henchir/XPDB
he ir/XD
herir/pXPD
hervir/XpD
huir/DpX  
imbuir/XD 
imponer/hX
inferir/X D
ingerir/X  D 
injerir/XD
inmiscuir/X D
inserir/XD
instituir/XD 
instruir/X   D   
interferir/XD 
intuir/XD   A
irruir/XD
luir/XD
maldecir/X      D
malherir/X D
manferir/XD
manir/XD
mantener/PX  D   
manutener/XD
mentir/hX  D
morir/Xn
muir/XD
obstruir/hXD
obtener/X    D
ocluir/DXQ
oponer/X  A
pedir/hXk  D  
perseguir/XD      P
pervertir/XPDQ
poner/uXoltnkbapgr
posponer/X
preconcebir/X
preelegir/XD
preferir/X D 
prevenir/aXD
proferir/X D
proseguir/PX
prostituir/X  D
rece ir/X
recluir/XQ   D
reconvertir/X
redarg ir/XD
redecir/X
reducir/X     DAIP
reelegir/X  D
reexpedir/XD
referir/X    D 
refre r/X
rehacer/XP
remedir/X
rendir/XDP    
requerir/XP    
reseguir/X
restituir/X  D
rete ir/X
revertir/XR
rever/X
saber/pDX
salir/rDpX
satisfacer/X   
seducir/XA     ID
sentir/fDnXaPp
ser/GX   D   NS
servir/X  D         
sofre r/X   D R
sonre r/X D R
subseguir/X
subvertir/X 
sugerir/X Q  D   
suponer/nX
ta er/XED
tener/Xafgj pD
traducir/X IAD    
transferir/X     D
trasferir/XD 
traso r/XDR
trasver/XL
travestir/XD
tribuir/XfapD
valer/nXD
venir/fXtalsorpgDn
ver/jXpbLn
vestir/rXpihkD
yuxtaponer/XA
zaherir/XD  
